Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4623
Appointment to taker in default.

If a powerholder makes an appointment to a taker in default of appointment and the appointee would have taken the property under a gift in default clause had the property not been appointed, the power of appointment is deemed not to have been exercised and the appointee takes under the clause.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 46.